Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-508
Department of Health and Human Services; cooperation with state institutions.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate with the state institutions for delinquent and mentally and physically handicapped children to ascertain the conditions of the home and the character and habits of the parents of a child, before his or her discharge from a state institution, and make recommendations as to the advisability of returning the child to his or her home. In case the department deems it unwise to have any such child returned to his or her former home, such state institution may, with the consent of the department, place such child into the care of the department.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 8, p. 184;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-508;

R.S.1943, § 43-508;

Laws 1989, LB 22, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 154;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 113.